Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1318
Eligibility.

Any person who is a paid member of a fire department or other emergency response organization and who receives retirement benefits in consequence of such employment shall not be eligible to participate in any service award benefit program being conducted by the same city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district which employs the person or which contracts for emergency response services with the fire department or emergency response organization which employs the person.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 18;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 14.